Utah statutes.
78A-7-210.   Justice court judge administrative responsibilities.

(1)  Justice court judges shall comply with and ensure that court personnel comply with applicable county or municipal rules and regulations related to personnel, budgets, and other administrative functions.

(2)  Failure by the judge to comply with applicable administrative county or municipal rules and regulations may be referred, by the county executive or municipal legislative body, to the state Justice Court Administrator.

(3)  Compliance with appropriate administrative requirements shall be considered as part of the Judicial Council's judicial performance evaluation program for justice court judges.

(4)  Repeated or willful noncompliance may be referred, by the county executive or municipal legislative body, to the Judicial Conduct Commission.

